West Virginia, session 2026, HB4763.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 3A. Procedures for Sign removal from Roadway. §17-3A-1. Procedure for the removal of "Flagger Ahead" signs. (a) All signs intended to warn drivers that work is being conducted, including, but not limited to, "flagger ahead" signs, must be removed from the roadway within 30 minutes of cessation of or removal of flaggers on any and all public roadways within the state.(b) Violations of this procedure will be prosecuted as follows:(1) A first offense will result in a warning and the offender shall be fined $50 for the court costs associated with adjudicating the offense;(2) A second offense will result in a $200 fine in additions to the court costs.(3) A third offense will result in the offender paying a $500 fine, court costs, and the offender will have their right-­of-way entry permit revoked.  (c) This section will become effective on July 1, 2026.